Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1077.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 102 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding definitions to read:§ 102. Definitions.Subject to additional definitions contained in subsequent provisions of this title which are applicable to specific provisions of this title, the following words and phrases when used in this title shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:* * *"N-Number registration marking." An alphanumeric string appearing on the side of an aircraft signifying the registration 12345678910111213141516171819202122 number assigned by the Federal Aviation Administration.* * *"Roadable aircraft." An aircraft which has a mode of transportation which enables operation of that of a motor vehicle and that is manufactured to meet Federal safety standards for a motorcycle.* * *Section 2. Title 75 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 1331.1. Issuance of roadable aircraft registration plates.Roadable aircraft shall be assigned permanently issued registration plates bearing the N-number registration marking of a size similar to that of a motorcycle registration plate.Section 3. Chapter 35 of Title 75 is amended by adding a subchapter to read:SUBCHAPTER B.1ROADABLE AIRCRAFTSec.3531. Operation of roadable aircraft.§ 3531. Operation of roadable aircraft.(a) General use.--A roadable aircraft shall be considered a motor vehicle when in operation, including on a public highway, except when the roadable aircraft is in use at an airport. When operating a roadable aircraft as a motor vehicle, an operator must comply with all rules and requirements under this title governing the operation of a motor vehicle.(b) Use for flight.--When in operation at an airport or in flight, a roadable aircraft shall be considered an aircraft and the operator must comply with all rules and requirements under 14 CFR (relating to aeronautics and space). An owner of a roadable aircraft registered in this Commonwealth must comply 20250SB1077PN1291 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 with all rules and regulations promulgated in this Commonwealth governing the registration, taxation and insurance of aircraft.(c) Limitation.--Except for emergency purposes, a roadable aircraft may only take off or land at an airport.(d) Definitions.-- As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Aircraft." As defined in 74 Pa.C.S. § 5102 (relating to definitions)."Airport." As defined in 74 Pa.C.S. § 5102.Section 4. Section 4702(g) of Title 75 is amended by adding a paragraph to read:§ 4702. Requirement for periodic inspection of vehicles.* * *(g) Exceptions.--The following are exceptions to subsection (f):* * *(5) Emission inspection criteria for registration of roadable aircraft with permanently issued registration plates bearing N-number registration marking.--A subject vehicle which displays an N-number registration marking shall be exempt from the requirements for emission.Section 5. Title 75 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 4734. Specific vehicle inspection.For federally mandated vehicle inspections or vehicles with a comprehensive inspection regimen exceeding the level required for safety certification in this Commonwealth, proof of completion of inspection and maintenance may be reviewed and accepted by a certified mechanic at an official inspection station in this Commonwealth for the purposes of roadable 20250SB1077PN1291 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 aircraft registration.Section 6. The definition of "all-terrain vehicle" or "ATV" in section 7702 of Title 75 is amended to read:§ 7702. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have, unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, the meanings given to them in this section:"All-terrain vehicle" or "ATV." A motorized off-highway vehicle which travels on three or more tires and which has:(1) a maximum width of 50 inches and a maximum dry weight of 1,200 pounds; or(2) a width which exceeds 50 inches or a dry weight which exceeds 1,200 pounds.An ATV described in paragraph (1) may be referred to as a Class I ATV, and an ATV described in paragraph (2) may be referred to as a Class II ATV. This term does not include snowmobiles, trail bikes, motorboats, golf carts, aircraft, roadable aircraft, dune buggies, automobiles, construction machines, trucks or home utility machines; military, fire, emergency and law enforcement vehicles; implements of husbandry; multipurpose agricultural vehicles; vehicles used by the department; or any vehicle that is or is required to be registered under Chapter 13 (relating to registration of vehicles). In addition, this term does not include off-road motor vehicles used exclusively as utility vehicles for agricultural or business operations and incidentally operated or moved upon the highway.* * *Section 7. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB1077PN1291 - 4 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728